Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall study classi-
fication and compensation for forestry and wildland fire positions in state government.  The
study must:
(a) Address  any wage and management compression that would result from changes in
classification and compensation.
(b) Identify the deficiencies in the span of control of the structure of the State  Forestry
Department and evaluate recommendations  for addressing these deficiencies, including the
classifications and number and type of employees needed to right size the  organizational
structure.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall submit a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to  the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources and wildfire  no
later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $229,154, to expend for the purposes described
in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 494 (SB 494-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 494 (SB 494-A) Page 2